src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-ija-ije_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# TODO: need to complete the paradigms as more forms are found-- just to make
# sure there's full coverage on various pheonmena, -ez/-jez, osv.

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.

  Noun - конференция: # Noun  конференция 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     конференция+N+Sg+Nom: конференция 
     конференция+N+Sg+Ill: конференцие
     конференция+N+Sg+Acc: конференциез
     конференция+N+Pl+Nom: конференциос
     конференция+N+Sg+Ine: конференциын
     конференция+N+Sg+Gen: конференцилэн
     конференция+N+Sg+Advl: конференцияя

  Noun - собрание: # Noun  собрание 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     собрание+N+Sg+Nom:  собрание
     собрание+N+Sg+Acc:  собраниез
     собрание+N+Pl+Nom:  собраниос
     собрание+N+Sg+Ine:  собраниын
     собрание+N+Sg+Gen:  собранилэн
     собрание+N+Sg+Advl: собраниея

  Noun - чия: # Noun чия 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     чия+N+Sg+Nom:  чия 
     чия+N+Sg+Dat:  чиялы
     чия+N+Sg+Ill:  чияе
     чия+N+Pl+Nom:  чияос
     чия+N+Sg+Ine:  чияын
     чия+N+Sg+Gen:  чиялэн
     чия+N+Sg+Advl: чияя

  Noun - Эстония: # Noun Эстония 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     Эстония+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:  Эстония
     Эстония+N+Prop+Sg+Acc:  Эстониез
     Эстония+N+Prop+Pl+Nom:  Эстониос
     Эстония+N+Prop+Sg+Ine:  Эстониын
     Эстония+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:  Эстонилэн
     Эстония+N+Prop+Sg+Advl: Эстонияя

  Noun - Самария: # Noun Самария 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     Самария+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:  Самария
     Самария+N+Prop+Pl+Nom:  Самарияос
     Самария+N+Prop+Sg+Ine:  Самарияын
     Самария+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:  Самариялэн
     Самария+N+Prop+Sg+Advl: Самарияя

  Noun - Евгения: # Noun Евгения 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     Евгения+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:  Евгения
     Евгения+N+Prop+Pl+Nom:  Евгенияос
     Евгения+N+Prop+Sg+Ine:  Евгенияын
     Евгения+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:  Евгениялэн
     Евгения+N+Prop+Sg+Advl: Евгенияя
